Utah statutes.
63C-10-202.   Duties -- Rural Coordinating Committee Steering Committee.

(1)  The committee shall:

(a)  coordinate efforts and available resources of appropriate state and federal agencies, institutions of higher education, local governments, private sector interests, associations, nonprofit organizations, and other entities in ways that address the economic development, planning, and leadership and training challenges and priorities of rural Utah as identified in the strategic plan prepared by the Governor's Rural Partnership Board; and

(b)  assist the Governor's Rural Partnership Board in the implementation of its strategic plan.

(2)  The committee may:

(a)  solicit the participation of appropriate federal agencies such as the USDA/Rural Development, the Small Business Administration, and Resource Coordination and Development Council directors to assist it in fulfilling its duties under Subsection (1); and

(b)  invite participation from other appropriate entities, departments, agencies, nonprofit organizations, and associations that can assist in the implementation of the strategic plan prepared by the Governor's Rural Partnership Board.

(3) (a)  The committee shall have a steering committee comprised of committee members identified in Subsections 63C-10-201(1)(a), (b), (c), and (d).

(b)  The steering committee:

(i)  shall:

(A)  provide, in coordination and cooperation with the Office of Rural Development, staff support to the Governor's Rural Partnership board;

(B)  call meetings and set agendas for, and otherwise be responsible to conduct the business of the Rural Coordinating Committee;

(C)  assist, as able, the Governor's Rural Partnership Board in the development and implementation of its strategic plan;

(D)  work with the other members of the Rural Coordinating Committee to coordinate efforts and focus available resources in ways that address the economic development, planning, and leadership training challenges and priorities of rural Utah as identified in the strategic plan; and

(E)  select three members to the nominating committee as required under Subsection 63C-10-102(2)(d)(i); and

(ii)  may:

(A)  invite participation from other committee members in steering committee meetings, as appropriate; and

(B)  hire or designate an executive director for the committee.



Enacted by Chapter 73, 2004 General Session

